Utah statutes.
79-5-304.   Public hearings required.
(1)  Prior to establishing any recreational trail under the jurisdiction and
control of the division, the division shall conduct a public hearing in the
area or areas of the state where the trail is proposed to be located.
(2)  Information to be considered at the hearings shall include the following:
(a)  the proposed route of the trail and the recommended modes of travel to be
permitted on it;
(b)  any plans to utilize areas adjacent to the trail for scenic, historic,
natural, cultural, or developmental purposes;
(c)  the characteristics that, in the judgment of the division, make the
proposed trail suitable as a recreational trail;
(d)  the current status of land ownership and the current and potential use of
land along the designated route;
(e)  the estimated cost of acquisition of lands or any interest in lands;
(f)  the plans and estimated costs for developing and maintaining the trail;
(g)  any plans for sharing the costs of developing, operating, and maintaining
the trail among state, federal, and local governmental entities and private
organizations;
(h)  any anticipated problems of policing the trail; and
(i)  any anticipated hazards to private lands adjacent to the trail.
